en: Bicycle Pumps
xx: Bicycle Pumps
cs: Hustilky na jízdní kola
da: Cykelpumper
de: Fahrradpumpen
es: Bombas para bicicletas
fr: Pompes pour vélos
it: Pompe per bicicletta
ja: 自転車空気入れ
nl: Fietspompen
no: Sykkelpumper
pl: Pompki rowerowe
pt: Bombas para bicicletas
ru: Велосипедные насосы
sv: Cykelpumpar
tr: Bisiklet Pompaları

en: Bicycle Saddle Pads & Seat Covers
xx: Bicycle Saddle Pads & Seat Covers
cs: Čalounění a obaly na sedla na kolo
da: Cykelsadler og sædeovertræk
de: Fahrradsattelbezüge & -polster
es: Fundas para asientos y sillines para bicicletas
fr: Couvre-selles pour vélos
it: Coperture e imbottiture per sellini di biciclette
ja: 自転車サドルカバー
nl: Zadelkussens en zadelhoezen voor fietsen
no: Puter og trekk til sykkelseter
pl: Pokrowce i nakładki na siodełka rowerowe
pt: Acolchoamento e capas para assentos de bicicleta
ru: Чехлы для велосипедных сидений
sv: Sadeldynor och sätesskydd för cyklar
tr: Bisiklet Sele Süngerleri ve Koltuk Kılıfları

en: Bicycle Shock Pumps
xx: Bicycle Shock Pumps
cs: Hustilky na galusky
da: Højtrykspumper til cykler
de: Dämpferpumpen
es: Bomba para horquillas de bicicleta
fr: Pompes pour amortisseurs de vélo
it: Pompe per ammortizzatori per biciclette
ja: 自転車用ショックポンプ
nl: Shockpompen
no: Pumper for sykkelstøtdempere
pl: Pompki do amortyzatorów
pt: Bombas de pressão para bicicleta
ru: Ударные велосипедные насосы
sv: Stötdämpare för cyklar
tr: Bisiklet Hız Göstergesi

en: Bicycle Spoke Beads
xx: Bicycle Spoke Beads
cs: Ozdobné korálky na výplet jízdních kol
da: Perler til cykeleger
de: Fahrradspeichen-Reflektoren
es: Adornos para radios de bicicletas
fr: Perles de rayons de vélo
it: Perle per raggi di bicicletta
ja: 自転車用スポークビーズ
nl: Spaakkralen
no: Eikeperler til sykkel
pl: Koraliki na szprychy
pt: Enfeites para roda de bicicleta
ru: Бусины для велосипедных спиц
sv: Ekerkulor för cykel
tr: Bisiklet Jant Süsleri

en: Bicycle Stands & Storage
xx: Bicycle Stands & Storage
cs: Stojany na kola a ukládání kol
da: Cykelstel og -opbevaring
de: Fahrradständer & Fahrradparksysteme
es: Bases y soportes para almacenar bicicletas
fr: Supports et rangements pour vélos
it: Supporti e portabiciclette
ja: 自転車スタンド・収納器具
nl: Fietsenstandaarden
no: Sykkelstativer og -oppbevaring
pl: Przechowywanie rowerów
pt: Suportes e armazenamento de bicicletas
ru: Велосипедные стойки и крепления
sv: Cykelställ och cykelförvaring
tr: Bisiklet Parkları ve Depoları

en: Bicycle Tire Repair Supplies & Kits
xx: Bicycle Tire Repair Supplies & Kits
cs: Sady na opravu a záplaty na pláště jízdních kol
da: Cykellapper og reparationskit
de: Flicken & Reparatur-Sets
es: Kits y parches de reparación para neumáticos de bicicletas
fr: Kits de réparation de pneus de vélo
it: Toppe e kit di riparazione per pneumatici di bicicletta
ja: 自転車タイヤ用パッチ・修理キット
nl: Bandenpleisters en reparatiesets voor fietsen
no: Reparasjonssett og deler til sykkeldekk
pl: Łaty i zestawy naprawcze do opon rowerowych
pt: Conjuntos de reparos e remendos em pneus de bicicleta
ru: Наборы и материалы для ремонта велосипедных шин
sv: Lagningslappar och reparationssatser för cykeldäck
tr: Bisiklet Lastik Yamaları ve Onarım Setleri

en: Bicycle Toe Straps & Clips
xx: Bicycle Toe Straps & Clips
cs: Klipsny a řemínky na jízdní kola
da: Tåclips til cykelpedaler
de: Fahrrad-Fußriemen
es: Clips y correas para pedales de bicicletas
fr: Cale-pieds et sangles pour vélo
it: Velcro e mollette per pantaloni per ciclisti
ja: 自転車用トーストラップ・トークリップ
nl: Toeclips en riempjes
no: Tåklips og -remmer til sykkel
pl: Strzemiona i zaczepy
pt: Biqueiras e presilhas para bicicleta
ru: Ремешки и туклипсы велосипедных педалей
sv: Tåband och -clips för cykel
tr: Bisiklet Pedalı Kayışları ve Klipsleri

en: Bicycle Tools
xx: Bicycle Tools
cs: Cyklistické nářadí
da: Cykelværktøjer
de: Fahrradwerkzeug
es: Herramientas para bicicletas
fr: Outils pour vélos
it: Strumenti per bicicletta
ja: 自転車用工具
nl: Fietsgereedschap
no: Sykkelverktøy
pl: Narzędzia do rowerów
pt: Ferramentas para bicicletas
ru: Инструменты для ремонта велосипедов
sv: Cykelverktyg
tr: Bisiklet Araçları

en: Bicycle Trailers
xx: Bicycle Trailers
cs: Vozíky ke kolům
da: Cykeltrailere
de: Fahrradanhänger
es: Remolques para bicicletas
fr: Remorques de vélo
it: Rimorchi per bicicletta
ja: 自転車用トレーラー
nl: Fietstrailers
no: Sykkeltilhengere
pl: Przyczepki rowerowe
pt: Trailers para bicicletas
ru: Велосипедные прицепы
sv: Cykelvagnar
tr: Bisiklet Römorkları

en: Bicycle Trainers
xx: Bicycle Trainers
cs: Cyklistické trenažéry
da: Cykeltræningsudstyr
de: Trainingsrollen
es: Entrenadores de bicicletas
fr: Vélos d'entraînement
it: Rimorchi bici
ja: 自転車トレーニング用品
nl: Zijwieltjes voor fietsen
no: Sykkelruller
pl: Trenażery rowerowe
pt: Aparelhos para treinamento com bicicleta
ru: Тренировочные стойки
sv: Cykeltrainers
tr: Bisiklet Eğitim Cihazı

en: Bicycle Training Wheels
xx: Bicycle Training Wheels
cs: Dětská kolečka ke kolům
da: Støttehjul til cykel
de: Stützräder
es: Ruedas de apoyo para bicicletas
fr: Roulettes de vélo
it: Rotelle laterali bicicletta
ja: 自転車補助輪
nl: Fietswieltjes
no: Sykkelstøttehjul
pl: Kółka boczne do roweru
pt: Rodas para treinamento com bicicleta
ru: Тренировочные колеса
sv: Stödhjul för cyklar
tr: Bisiklet Yan Destek Tekerlekleri

en: Bicycle Transport Bags & Cases
xx: Bicycle Transport Bags & Cases
cs: Transportní tašky a pouzdra na kola
da: Cykel – transporttasker og -kasser
de: Fahrradtaschen & -koffer
es: Maletas y bolsas de transporte para bicicletas
fr: Étuis et sacs de transport pour vélos
it: Borse e scatole trasporto bici
ja: 自転車用キャリーバッグ・収納ケース
nl: Vervoertassen en -koffers voor fietsen
no: Transportvesker og kasser for sykler
pl: Torby i kufry rowerowe
pt: Sacos e estojos de transporte de bicicletas
ru: Сумки и чехлы для перевозки велосипедов
sv: Transportsäckar och lådor för cyklar
tr: Bisiklet Taşıma Çanta ve Kılıfları

en: Bicycle Water Sport Board Racks
xx: Bicycle Water Sport Board Racks
cs: Cyklistické nosiče na surfová prkna
da: Cykelsurfboardstativer
de: Surfbretthalterungen für Fahrräder
es: Bacas para planchas de surf para bicicletas
fr: Porte-planches de sports nautiques pour vélos
it: Portatavola da sport acquatici per biciclette
ja: 自転車用サーフボードキャリア
nl: Surfkarren voor fietsen
no: Surfebrettstativ til sykkel
pl: Bagażniki rowerowe na deskę surfingową
pt: Racks de prancha de surf para bicicleta
ru: Велосипедные багажники для досок для сёрфинга
sv: Surfbrädefästen för cyklar
tr: Bisiklet Su Sporu Tahtası Rafları

en: Electric Bicycle Conversion Kits
xx: Electric Bicycle Conversion Kits
cs: Sady elektrického pohonu pro kola
da: Sæt til konvertering til elcykel
de: Umrüstsatz für E-Bikes
es: Kits de conversión eléctrica para bicicletas
fr: Kits de conversion pour vélo électrique
it: Kit di conversione bici elettriche
ja: 自転車電動化キット
nl: Ombouwsets voor elektrische fietsen
no: Sett for ombygging til elektriske sykler
pl: Cześci do wakeboardingu
pt: Kits de conversão para bicicletas elétricas
ru: Комплекты для установки электронного привода на велосипед
sv: Satser för elcykelskonvertering
tr: Elektrikli Bisiklet Dönüştürme Setleri

en: Bicycle Parts
xx: Bicycle Parts
cs: Díly jízdních kol
da: Cykeldele
de: Fahrradbauteile
es: Piezas para bicicletas
fr: Pièces détachées vélo, Composant de vélo
it: Parti per bicicletta
ja: 自転車パーツ
nl: Fietsonderdelen
no: Sykkeldeler
pl: Części rowerowe
pt: Peças de bicicleta
ru: Детали для велосипедов
sv: Cykeldelar
tr: Bisiklet Parçaları

en: Bicycle Brake Parts
xx: Bicycle Brake Parts
cs: Součásti brzd jízdních kol
da: Cykelbremsedele
de: Fahrradbremsenteile
es: Piezas de frenos para bicicletas
fr: Pièces de frein de vélo
it: Parti freni per bicicletta
ja: 自転車ブレーキパーツ
nl: Fietsremonderdelen
no: Deler til sykkelbremser
pl: Części układu hamulcowego roweru
pt: Peças para freio de bicicleta
ru: Детали тормозных систем велосипедов
sv: Delar till cykelbromsar
tr: Bisiklet Fren Parçaları

en: Bicycle Brake Calipers
xx: Bicycle Brake Calipers
cs: Brzdové třmeny na kola
da: Cykelbremsebakker
de: Bremssättel
es: Brazos de freno para bicicletas
fr: Étriers de frein de vélo
it: Pinze freni per bicicletta
ja: 自転車ブレーキキャリパー
nl: Fietsschijfremmen
no: Bremsekalipere til sykkel
pl: Szczęki hamulcowe
pt: Calibradores de freio de bicicleta
ru: Велосипедные тормозные скобы
sv: Cykelbromsok
tr: Bisiklet Fren Ayakları

en: Bicycle Brake Levers
xx: Bicycle Brake Levers
cs: Brzdové páky na kola
da: Cykelbremsehåndtag
de: Bremshebel
es: Palancas de freno para bicicletas
fr: Poignées de frein de vélo
it: Leve freni per bicicletta
ja: 自転車ブレーキレバー
nl: Fietshandremmen
no: Sykkelbremsehendler
pl: Klamki hamulcowe
pt: Maçanetas de freio de bicicleta
ru: Велосипедные тормозные рычаги
sv: Cykelbromshandtag
tr: Bisiklet Fren Kolları

en: Bicycle Brake Rotors
xx: Bicycle Brake Rotors
cs: Brzdové kotouče pro jízdní kola
da: Cykelbremserotor
de: Bremsrotoren
es: Rotores de freno para bicicletas
fr: Disques de frein de vélo
it: Dischi freni per bicicletta
ja: 自転車ブレーキローター
nl: Fietsremschijven
no: Sykkelbremseskiver
pl: Tarcze hamulcowe
pt: Rotores de freio de bicicleta
ru: Велосипедные тормозные роторы
sv: Cykelbromsskivor
tr: Bisiklet Fren Rotorları

en: Bicycle Brake Sets
xx: Bicycle Brake Sets
cs: Brzdové sady na kola
da: Cykelbremsesæt
de: Bremsen-Sets
es: Conjuntos de frenos para bicicletas
fr: Ensemble de freinage pour vélo
it: Set freni per bicicletta
ja: 自転車ブレーキセット
nl: Fietsremsets
no: Sykkelbremsesett
pl: Zestawy hamulców rowerowych
pt: Conjuntos de freios para bicicleta
ru: Велосипедные тормозные системы
sv: Cykelbromsset
tr: Bisiklet Fren Setleri